Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB433.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 158.447 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Department of Education shall require a local board of education to review
Crime Prevention Through Environment Design principles, or CPTED principles, and
consult with the Center for School Safety when constructing a new school building or
when renovating an existing school building.
Page 1 of 1
BR032800.100 - 328 - XXXX 3/4/2025 3:34 PM Jacketed